Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-266
Common carrier; prohibited acts.

No common carrier shall disconnect or order the disconnection of a subscriber's basic telecommunications service as a result of the subscriber's failure to pay interstate or intrastate pay-per-call service charges.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1107;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 128.